Hawaii statutes.
[§327E-7] Obligations of health-care
provider. (a) Before implementing a health-care decision made for a
patient, a supervising health-care provider, if possible, shall promptly
communicate to the patient the decision made and the identity of the person
making the decision.

(b) A supervising health-care provider who
knows of the existence of an advance health-care directive, a revocation of an
advance health-care directive, or a designation or disqualification of a
surrogate, shall promptly record its existence in the patient's health-care
record and, if it is in writing, shall request a copy and if one is furnished
shall arrange for its maintenance in the health-care record.

(c) A supervising health-care provider who
makes or is informed of a determination that a patient lacks or has recovered
capacity, or that another condition exists which affects an individual
instruction or the authority of an agent, guardian, or surrogate, shall
promptly record the determination in the patient's health-care record and
communicate the determination to the patient, if possible, and to any person
then authorized to make health-care decisions for the patient.

(d) Except as provided in subsections (e) and
(f), a health-care provider or institution providing care to a patient shall:

(1) Comply with an individual instruction of the
patient and with a reasonable interpretation of that instruction made by a
person then authorized to make health-care decisions for the patient; and

(2) Comply with a health-care decision for the
patient made by a person then authorized to make health-care decisions for the
patient to the same extent as if the decision had been made by the patient
while having capacity.

(e) A health-care provider may decline to
comply with an individual instruction or health-care decision for reasons of
conscience. A health-care institution may decline to comply with an individual
instruction or health-care decision if the instruction or decision is contrary
to a policy of the institution which is expressly based on reasons of
conscience and if the policy was timely communicated to the patient or to a
person then authorized to make health-care decisions for the patient.

(f) A health-care provider or institution may
decline to comply with an individual instruction or health-care decision that
requires medically ineffective health care or health care contrary to generally
accepted health-care standards applicable to the health-care provider or
institution.

(g) A health-care provider or institution that
declines to comply with an individual instruction or health-care decision
shall:

(1) Promptly so inform the patient, if possible, and
any person then authorized to make health-care decisions for the patient;

(2) Provide continuing care to the patient until a
transfer can be effected; and

(3) Unless the patient or person then authorized to
make health-care decisions for the patient refuses assistance, immediately make
all reasonable efforts to assist in the transfer of the patient to another
health-care provider or institution that is willing to comply with the
instruction or decision.

(h) A health-care provider or institution may
not require or prohibit the execution or revocation of [an] advance health-care
directive as a condition for providing health care. [L 1999, c 169, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next